Arkansas, session 2025, HB1677.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 64, Subchapter 9, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-64-912. Emergency medication kits — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "emergency medication kit" means a kit
containing medication that may be required for immediate therapeutic needs of
a patient and that are not available from any other source in sufficient time
to prevent risk of harm by delay.
(b)(1) An alcohol and drug abuse treatment program, including a stand-
alone detoxification facility or substance abuse treatment center, may
maintain an emergency medication kit if the alcohol and drug abuse treatment
program has a physician or other medical personnel on staff and is able to
administer the controlled substances and noncontrolled legend drugs.
(2)(A) The alcohol and drug abuse treatment program shall
designate one (1) licensed pharmacy to supply and oversee the emergency
medication kit.
(B) The licensed pharmacy under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of
*JMB463*
03-31-2025 12:18:10 JMB463

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 HB1677
this section shall be registered with the United States Drug Enforcement
Administration and licensed by the Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy.
(3) The emergency medication kit shall be:
(A) Stored in a locked container or cabinet behind a
locked door; and
(B) Accessible only to licensed medical personnel.
(4) The medication in the emergency medication kit shall only be
administered by licensed medical personnel acting on the order of a physician
or advanced practice registered nurse in compliance with 21 C.F.R. § 1306.11
and 21 C.F.R. § 1306.21.
(5) All drugs administered from the kit shall be replaced within
seventy-two (72) hours by the designated licensed pharmacy based on a
prescription for the patient to whom the drugs were administered.
(c) The Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy shall adopt rules regarding
the emergency medication kit, including without limitation:
(1) The contents of the emergency medication kit, which shall
not contain a Schedule II controlled substance;
(2) The quantity of each medication in the emergency medication
kit;
(3) The storage and security requirements for an emergency
medication kit; and
(4) The use and access of an emergency medication kit.

/s/Bentley












03-31-2025 12:18:10 JMB463